Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.67
Membership or admission to or purchase by zoo or aquarium; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any sale of a membership in or an admission to or any purchase by a nationally accredited zoo or aquarium operated by a public agency or nonprofit corporation primarily for educational, scientific, or tourism purposes.

Laws 2015, LB419, § 3.